pt-PT: Tipo de padrão do piso: Todo-o-terreno; Crista central; Direcional; Banda de rodagem tipo lima; Com relevo; Microestriado; Semiliso; Liso; Com cravos; Waffle; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de profil al benzii de rulare: All-terrain; Creastă centrală; Direcțional; Profil fin; Cramponat; Micro-striat; Semi-slick; Slick; Cu ținte; Waffle / vafe; Altele
sk-SK: Typ profilu pneumatiky: Do každého terénu; Stredový hrebeň; Smerový; Pilníkový vzor; Štupľový; Mikro vrúbkovaný; Poloslick; Hladký (slick); S hrotmi; Vaflový; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta vzorca tekalne plasti: Za vse terene; Sredinski greben; Smerno; Pilast profil; Čepast; Mikro narebričen; Polgladek (semi-slick); Gladek (slick); Z bodicami; Vafel; Drugo
cs: Typ vzoru dezénu: All-terrain; Středový pruh; Směrový; Pilníkový vzorek; Špuntový; Mikro rýhovaný; Semi-slick; Slick; S hroty; Vaflový; Jiné
ru: Тип рисунка протектора: Вездеходный; Центральное ребро; Направленный; Напильник; С грунтозацепами; С микронакаткой; Полуслик; Слик; Шипованный; Вафельный; Другое
lt-LT: Protektoriaus rašto tipas: Universalaus pravažumo; Centrinė briauna; Kryptinis; Smulkaus rašto; Grubus; Mikro rievėtas; Pusiau lygus; Lygus; Dygliuotas; Vaflinis raštas; Kita
el: Τύπος σχεδίου πέλματος: Παντός εδάφους; Κεντρική ράχη; Κατευθυντικό; Πέλμα τύπου λίμας; Με τακούνια; Με μικρο-ραβδώσεις; Ημιλείο; Λείο; Με καρφιά; Βάφλα; Άλλο
pl: Typ wzoru bieżnika: Terenowy (All-terrain); Grzbiet centralny; Kierunkowy; Wzór typu pilnik; Z klockami; Mikroradełkowany; Semi-slick; Slick; Z kolcami; Waflowy; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta uzorka gaznog sloja: Za sve terene; Središnji greben; Usmjereno; Fino nazubljeni uzorak; S čepovima; Mikro-nazubljeno; Poluglatko (semi-slick); Glatko (slick); S čavlima; U obliku vafla; Ostalo
sv: Typ av slitbanemönster: Allterräng; Mittås; Riktad; Filat mönster; Nabbad; Mikrolättrad; Semi-slick; Slick; Dubbad; Våffelmönster; Övrigt
th: ประเภทของลายดอกยาง: ออลเทอร์เรน; แนวสันกลาง; แบบทิศทางเดียว; ลายตะไบ; ดอกยางหนา; ลายเส้นนูนละเอียด; ดอกยางเรียบแบบครึ่งเดียว; ดอกยางเรียบ; ฝังหมุด; ลายวาฟเฟิล; อื่นๆ
hu: Futófelület mintázat típusa: Terep; Középső borda; Forgásirányos; Reszelőmintás; Bütykös; Mikrobarázdált; Semi-slick; Slick; Szöges; Gofri minta; Egyéb
ja: ねじパターンタイプ: オールテレーン; センターリッジ; ディレクショナル; ファイルトレッド; ノビー; マイクロローレット; セミスリック; スリック; スタッド付き; ワッフル; その他
fi: Rengaskuvion tyyppi: Maasto; Keskiharjanne; Suunnattu; Viilakuvio; Nappulakuvio; Mikropyälletty; Puolisileä; Sileä; Nastoitettu; Vohvelikuvio; Muu
bg-BG: Тип шарка на протектора: За всякакъв терен (All-terrain); Централен ръб; С посока; Диамантена шарка (File tread); С грайфер (Knobby); Микроназъбени; Полуслик; Слик; С шипове; Вафлен профил; Друго
vi: Loại kiểu dáng gai lốp: Mọi địa hình; Gân giữa; Định hướng; Gai nhám; Gai to; Gai siêu nhỏ; Bán trơn; Trơn; Có đinh; Waffle; Khác
de: Reifenprofil: All-Terrain; Mittelsteg; Laufrichtungsgebunden; Diamantprofil; Stollenprofil; Mikro-gerändelt; Semi-Slick; Slick; Mit Spikes; Waffelprofil; Sonstige
it: Tipo di pattern del battistrada: All-terrain; Costolatura centrale; Direzionale; File tread; Tassellato; Microzigrinato; Semi-slick; Slick; Chiodato; Waffle; Altro
es: Tipo de dibujo de la banda de rodadura: Todo terreno; Cresta central; Direccional; Banda de rodadura tipo lima; Con tacos; Microestriado; Semiliso; Liso; Con clavos; Tipo gofre; Otro
tr: Diş deseni tipi: Tüm araziler; Orta sırt; Yönlü; Törpü dişli; Dişli; Mikro tırtıklı; Yarı düz; Düz; Çivili; Waffle; Diğer
en: Tread pattern type: All-terrain; Center ridge; Directional; File tread; Knobby; Micro-knurled; Semi-slick; Slick; Studded; Waffle; Other
nl: Type profielpatroon: All-terrain; Middenrichel; Richtinggebonden; Vijlprofiel; Noppen; Micro-gekarteld; Semi-slick; Slick; Met spikes; Wafel; Overig
nb: Type mønster: All-terrain; Senterrygg; Retningsbestemt; Finmønstret; Knaster; Mikrokryssmønstret; Semislicks; Slicks; Pigg; Vaffel; Annet
fr: Type de sculpture: Tout-terrain; Arête centrale; Directionnel; Profil lime; Crampons; Micro-moleté; Semi-slick; Slick; Clouté; Gaufré; Autre
da: Type af slidbanemønster: All-terrain; Midterste rille; Retningsbestemt; Fil-mønster; Knopmønster; Mikroriflet; Semi-slick; Slick; Med pigge; Vaffelmønster; Andet
zh-TW: 胎紋類型: 全地形; 中央脊紋; 單向; 銼刀紋; 顆粒紋; 微型滾花; 半平滑; 平滑; 鑲釘; 鬆餅紋; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de desenho do sulco: Todo terreno; Estria central; Direcional; Piso tipo lixa; Nodoso; Microserrilhado; Semi-slick; Liso (Slick); Cravejado; Waffle; Outro
zh-CN: 胎面花纹类型: 全地形; 中心凸脊; 定向; 菱形纹; 颗粒纹; 微滚花; 半光面; 光面; 镶钉; 华夫格; 其他
ko: 트레드 패턴 유형: 올터레인; 센터 리지; 디렉셔널; 파일 트레드; 노비; 마이크로 널; 세미 슬릭; 슬릭; 스터드; 와플; 기타